test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VV_gookookohoo_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - VV - gookookhoo :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     gookook'oo+NA: gookookhoo
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+gookook'oo+NA: ngookookhoo
     2+gookook'oo+NA: ggookookhoo
     X+gookook'oo+NA: gookookhoo
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     gookook'oo+NA+Con: gookookhoonh
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim: gookookhoons
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     gookook'oo+NA+Pej: gookookhoosh
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     gookook'oo+NA+Prt: gookookhooba
     gookook'oo+NA+Voc+Pl: gookookhoodig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     gookook'oo+NA+4: gookookhoon
     gookook'oo+NA+Loc: gookookhoong
     gookook'oo+NA+Pl: gookookhoog
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con: ngookookhoonh
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim: ngookookhoons
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con: ggookookhoonh
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim: ggookookhoons
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con: gookookhoonh
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim: gookookhoons
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos: ngookookhoom
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos: ggookookhoom
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos: gookookhoom
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Pej: ngookookhoosh
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej: ggookookhoosh
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Pej: gookookhoosh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+gookook'oo+NA+1+Pl: ngookookhoonaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+1+Pl: ggookookhoonaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+2+Pl: ggookookhoowaa
     3+gookook'oo+NA+3+4: gookookhooni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Prt: ngookookhooba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoodig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Prt: ggookookhooba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoodig
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Prt: gookookhooba
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Voc+Pl: gookookhoodig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+4: ngookookhoon
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Loc: ngookookhoong
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Pl: ngookookhoog
     2+gookook'oo+NA+4: ggookookhoon
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Loc: ggookookhoong
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pl: ggookookhoog
     3+gookook'oo+NA+4: gookookhoon
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Loc: gookookhoong
     X+gookook'oo+NA+4: gookookhoon
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Loc: gookookhoong
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Pl: gookookhoog
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej: gookookhoonyish
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej: gookookhoonsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt: gookookhoonyba
     gookook'oo+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: gookookhoonydig
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt: gookookhoonsba
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: gookookhoonsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     gookook'oo+NA+Con+4: gookookhoonyin
     gookook'oo+NA+Con+Loc: gookookhoonying
     gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pl: gookookhoonyig
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim+4: gookookhoonsan
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Loc: gookookhoonsing
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pl: gookookhoonsag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Prt: gookookhooshba
     gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: gookookhooshdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     gookook'oo+NA+Pej+4: gookookhooshan
     gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Loc: gookookhooshing
     gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Pl: gookookhooshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     gookook'oo+NA+Prt+4: gookookhoobniin
     gookook'oo+NA+Prt+Loc: gookookhoobniing
     gookook'oo+NA+Prt+Pl: gookookhoobniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos: ngookookhoonyim
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos: ngookookhoonsim
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos: ggookookhoonyim
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos: ggookookhoonsim
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos: gookookhoonyim
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos: gookookhoonsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej: ngookookhoonyish
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej: ngookookhoonsish
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej: ggookookhoonyish
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej: ggookookhoonsish
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej: gookookhoonyish
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej: gookookhoonsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl: ngookookhoonynaa
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl: ngookookhoonsnaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl: ggookookhoonynaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+2+Pl: ggookookhoonywaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl: ggookookhoonsnaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+2+Pl: ggookookhoonswaa
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+3+4: gookookhoonyni
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+3+4: gookookhoonsni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt: ngookookhoonyba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoonydig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt: ngookookhoonsba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoonsdig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt: ggookookhoonyba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonydig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt: ggookookhoonsba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonsdig
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt: gookookhoonyba
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: gookookhoonydig
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt: gookookhoonsba
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: gookookhoonsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+4: ngookookhoonyin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Loc: ngookookhoonying
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pl: ngookookhoonyig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+4: ngookookhoonsan
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Loc: ngookookhoonsing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pl: ngookookhoonsag
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+4: ggookookhoonyin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Loc: ggookookhoonying
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pl: ggookookhoonyig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+4: ggookookhoonsan
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Loc: ggookookhoonsing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pl: ggookookhoonsag
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+4: gookookhoonyin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Loc: gookookhoonying
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+4: gookookhoonsan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Loc: gookookhoonsing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+4: gookookhoonyin
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Loc: gookookhoonying
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pl: gookookhoonyig
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+4: gookookhoonsan
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Loc: gookookhoonsing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pl: gookookhoonsag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej: ngookookhoomish
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej: ggookookhoomish
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej: gookookhoomish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: ngookookhoomnaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: ggookookhoomnaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl: ggookookhoomwaa
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+3+4: gookookhoomni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Prt: ngookookhoomba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoomdig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Prt: ggookookhoomba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoomdig
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Prt: gookookhoomba
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gookookhoomdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+4: ngookookhooman
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Loc: ngookookhooming
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pl: ngookookhoomag
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+4: ggookookhooman
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Loc: ggookookhooming
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pl: ggookookhoomag
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+4: gookookhooman
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Loc: gookookhooming
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+4: gookookhooman
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Loc: gookookhooming
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pl: gookookhoomag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+1+Pl: ngookookhooshnaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+1+Pl: ggookookhooshnaa
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+2+Pl: ggookookhooshwaa
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+3+4: gookookhooshni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Prt: ngookookhooshba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: ngookookhooshdig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Prt: ggookookhooshba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: ggookookhooshdig
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Prt: gookookhooshba
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: gookookhooshdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+4: ngookookhooshan
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Loc: ngookookhooshing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Pl: ngookookhooshag
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+4: ggookookhooshan
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Loc: ggookookhooshing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Pl: ggookookhooshag
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+4: gookookhooshan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Loc: gookookhooshing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+4: gookookhooshan
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Loc: gookookhooshing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Pl: gookookhooshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+gookook'oo+NA+1+Pl+Prt: ngookookhoonaanba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoonaandig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+1+Pl+Prt: ggookookhoonaanba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonaandig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+2+Pl+Prt: ggookookhoowaaba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoowaadig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+3+4+Prt: gookookhoonwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+1+Pl+4: ngookookhoonaanin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+1+Pl+Loc: ngookookhoonaaning
     1+gookook'oo+NA+1+Pl+Pl: ngookookhoonaanig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+1+Pl+4: ggookookhoonaanin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+1+Pl+Loc: ggookookhoonaaning
     2+gookook'oo+NA+1+Pl+Pl: ggookookhoonaanig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+2+Pl+4: ggookookhoowaan
     2+gookook'oo+NA+2+Pl+Loc: ggookookhoowaang
     2+gookook'oo+NA+2+Pl+Pl: ggookookhoowaag
     3+gookook'oo+NA+2+Pl+4: gookookhoowaan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+2+Pl+Loc: gookookhoowaang
     3+gookook'oo+NA+3+4+4: gookookhoonwan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+3+4+Loc: gookookhooniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Prt+4: ngookookhoobniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoobniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoobniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Prt+4: ggookookhoobniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoobniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoobniig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Prt+4: gookookhoobniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Prt+Loc: gookookhoobniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Prt+4: gookookhoobniin
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Prt+Loc: gookookhoobniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Prt+Pl: gookookhoobniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: gookookhoonyshiba
     gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: gookookhoonyshidig
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: gookookhoonsshiba
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: gookookhoonsshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+4: gookookhoonyshan
     gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: gookookhoonyshing
     gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: gookookhoonyshag
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+4: gookookhoonsshan
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: gookookhoonsshing
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: gookookhoonsshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6, 7
     gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt+4: gookookhoonybaniin
     gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonybaniing
     gookook'oo+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: gookookhoonybaniig
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt+4: gookookhoonsbaniin
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonsbaniing
     gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: gookookhoonsbaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6, 7
     gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Prt+4: gookookhooshbaniin
     gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: gookookhooshbaniing
     gookook'oo+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: gookookhooshbaniig
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: ngookookhoonymish
